Wyoming, session 2025, HB0092.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. The Wyoming livestock board shall initiate
memorandums of understanding with any state that receives
Wyoming livestock. The memorandums of understanding shall
establish that livestock may be identified by the methods
provided in W.S. 11-18-117(c).
Section 2. The Wyoming livestock board shall provide
a status report to the joint agriculture, state and public
lands and water resources interim committee on the progress
of developing memorandums of understanding with other
states on or before January 1, 2026 and on or before June
30, 2026.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0092
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2